Utah statutes.
34-19-2.   Injunctive relief prohibited in certain cases.

No court, nor any judge or judges of it, shall have jurisdiction to issue any restraining order or temporary or permanent injunction which in specific or general terms prohibits any person or persons from doing, whether singly or in concert, any of the following acts:

(1)  ceasing or refusing to perform any work or to remain in any relation of employment regardless of any promise, undertaking, contract or agreement to do such work or to remain in such employment;

(2)  becoming or remaining a member of any labor organization or of any employer organization, regardless of any such undertaking or promise as is described in Section 34-19-3;

(3)  paying or giving to or withholding from any person any strike or unemployment benefits or insurance or other money or things of value;

(4)  by all lawful means aiding any person who is being proceeded against in or is prosecuting any action or suit in any court of the United States or of any state;

(5)  giving publicity to and obtaining or communicating information regarding the existence of or the facts involved in any dispute, whether by advertising, speaking, patrolling any public street or any place where any person or persons may lawfully be, without intimidation or coercion, or by any other method not involving fraud, violence, breach of the peace, or threat of same;

(6)  ceasing to patronize or to employ any person or persons;

(7)  assembling peaceably to do or to organize to do any of the acts heretofore specified or to promote lawful interests;

(8)  advising or notifying any person or persons of an intention to do any of the acts heretofore specified;

(9)  agreeing with other persons to do or not to do any of the acts heretofore specified;

(10)  advising, urging, or inducing without fraud, violence, or threat of same, others to do the acts heretofore specified, regardless of any such undertaking or promise as is described in Section 34-19-3;

(11)  doing any act or thing which might lawfully be done in the absence of labor dispute by any party thereto; or

(12)  doing in concert any or all of the acts heretofore specified on the ground that the persons engaged therein constitute an unlawful combination or conspiracy.



Amended by Chapter 10, 1997 General Session

